Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2158.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(1) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 4. Schedules of Controlled Substances.--The following schedules include the controlled substances listed or to be listed by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or trade name designated.(1) Schedule I--In determining that a substance comes within 12345678910111213141516171819202122 this schedule, the secretary shall find: a high potential for abuse, no currently accepted medical use in the United States, and a lack of accepted safety for use under medical supervision. The following controlled substances are included in this schedule:* * *(ix) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation that contains 7-hydroxymitragynine in a concentration equal to or exceeding 2% of the total alkaloid content or 1 milligram per recommended serving size, or any synthetic, semi-synthetic or chemically manipulated form of mitragynine, 7-hydroxymitragynine, mitragynine pseudoindoxyl or any other synthetic, semi-synthetic or chemically manipulated alkaloid, metabolite, derivative or analogue of the Mitragyna speciosa plant.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2158PN2792 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617